Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.050

Resolution method.

Such districts may also be organized upon the adoption by the county commissioners of a resolution of intention so to do, in lieu of the procedure hereinbefore provided for the presentation of petitions. In the event the county commissioners adopt a resolution of intention, such resolution shall describe the boundaries of the proposed district and shall set a time and place at which they will consider the organization of the district, and shall state that all persons interested may appear and be heard. Such resolution of intention shall be published in the same manner and for the same length of time as a petition.

[ 1957 c 153 s 5.]